en: Steamed salmon
fr: Saumon cuit à la vapeur

en: Salmons from farming
es: Salmones de granja
fi: viljellyt lohet
fr: Saumons d'élevage
hr: Losos iz uzgoja
it: Salmoni d'allevamenti
nl: Gekweekte zalm

en: Microwaved salmons from farming, Salmons from farming microwaved
fr: Saumon d'élevage cuit au micro-ondes

en: Salmons from farming boiled, Salmons from farming cooked in water
fr: Saumon d'élevage bouilli, Saumon d'élevage cuit à l'eau chaude

en: Baked farmed salmons, Roasted farmed salmons
fr: Saumons d'élevage cuit au four

en: Salmon steaks
de: Lachssteaks
fr: Pavés de saumon
hr: Odresci lososa

en: Salmon fillets
bg: Филе от сьомга
de: Lachsfilets
es: Filetes de salmón
fi: lohifileet
fr: Filets de saumon
hr: Fileti lososa
it: Filetto di salmone
nl: Zalmfilet
pt: Filetes de salmão

en: Frozen salmon fillets
fr: Filets de saumon surgelés

en: Salmon with sorrel
fr: Saumon à l'oseille

en: Wild salmons
bg: Дива сьомга
de: Wildlachs
es: Salmones salvajes
fr: Saumons sauvages, saumon sauvage
hr: Divlji lososi
it: Salmone selvaggio
nl: Wilde zalmen, Wilde zalm

en: Frozen wild salmons
fr: Saumons sauvages surgelés, saumon sauvage surgelé

en: Wild salmons fillets
fr: Filets de saumon sauvage surgelés

en: Frozen wild salmons fillets
fr: Filets de saumon saumon sauvage surgelés

en: Sardines
bg: Сардини
ca: Sardines
da: Sardiner
de: Sardinen, Sardine
es: Sardinas
fi: sardiinit
fr: Sardines, sardine
he: סרדינים
hr: Sardine
hu: Szardínia
it: Sardine
ja: サーディン
nl: Sardientjes
pl: Sardynki
pt: Sardinhas
tr: Sardalya
zh: 沙丁鱼

en: Haddock
de: Schellfisch
fr: Églefin, Haddock
hr: koljak
ja: コダラ

en: Haddock fillets, Haddock fillet
fr: Filets d'églefin, Filets d'aiglefin, Filet d'églefin

en: Grilled haddock, Pan-fried haddock
fr: Églefin grillé, Églefin poêlé

en: Steamed haddock
fr: Églefin cuit à la vapeur

en: conger
fr: Congre
hr: Morska jegulja
ja: アナゴ属

en: Roundnose grenadier
fr: Grenadier, Grenadier de roche